Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1218
Violation; penalty.

Any person who shall violate any provisions of section 2-1217 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1935, c. 173, § 22, p. 638;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1518;

R.S.1943, § 2-1218;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 14;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 10.
April 20, 2022